Nevada, session 83, SB203.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 463.0157 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
463.0157 1. “Gaming employee” means any employee,
temporary employee or other representative of an operator of a slot
route, the operator of a pari-mutuel system, the operator of an inter-
casino linked system or a manufacturer, distributor or disseminator,
or a gaming establishment licensed to conduct any game, 16 or more
slot machines, a race book, sports pool or pari-mutuel wagering,
whose job duties pertain to the operation, control or outcome of any
gambling game or the access, transport or review of any gaming
revenue, including, without limitation:
(a) Accounting or internal auditing personnel who are directly
involved in any recordkeeping or the examination of records
associated with revenue from gaming;
(b) Table games personnel;
(c) Cage and counting room personnel;
(d) Slot personnel;
(e) Keno personnel;
(f) Race book and sports pool personnel;
(g) Employees of a person required by NRS 464.010 to be
[licensed] registered to operate an off-track pari-mutuel system;
(h) [Employees of a person required by NRS 463.430 to be
licensed to disseminate information concerning racing and
employees of an affiliate of such a person involved in assisting the
person in carrying out the duties of the person in this State;
(i)] Employees of a person required by paragraph (e) of
subsection 1 of NRS 463.160 to be registered to operate as a cash
access and wagering instrument service provider;
[(j)] (i) Employees whose duties are directly involved with the
manufacture, repair, sale or distribution of gaming devices,
associated equipment when the employer is required by NRS
463.650 to be licensed, cashless wagering systems or interactive
gaming systems;
[(k)] (j) Employees of operators of interactive gaming systems
whose duties include the operational or supervisory control of the
systems or the games that are part of the systems;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
[(l)] (k) Employees of operators of call centers who perform, or
who supervise the performance of, the function of receiving and
transmitting wagering instructions;
[(m)] (l) Employees who have access to the Board’s system of
records for the purpose of processing the registrations of gaming
employees that a licensee is required to perform pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto;
[(n)] (m) Information technology personnel who have
operational or supervisory control over information technology
systems associated with any of the matters related to gaming
described in this subsection;
[(o)] (n) Hosts or other persons empowered to extend credit or
complimentary services related to gaming;
[(p)] (o) Machine mechanics;
[(q)] (p) Odds makers and line setters;
[(r)] (q) Security personnel;
[(s)] (r) Shift or pit bosses;
[(t)] (s) Shills;
[(u)] (t) Supervisors or managers whose duties include the
supervision of employees described in this subsection;
[(v)] (u) Employees of a person required by NRS 463.160 to be
licensed to operate an information service;
[(w)] (v) Club venue employees; and
[(x)] (w) Other persons whose duties are similar to the
classifications set forth in paragraphs (a) to [(w),] (v), inclusive, as
the Commission may from time to time designate by regulation.
2. “Gaming employee” does not include employees whose
duties do not involve gaming activities, persons engaged exclusively
in preparing or serving food or beverages or persons involved
primarily in the resort or hotel functions of a licensed gaming
establishment.
Sec. 1.1. NRS 463.0165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0165 “License” means a gaming license [,] or a
manufacturer’s or distributor’s license . [, a license issued to a
disseminator of information concerning racing or a license issued to
an operator of an off-track pari-mutuel system.]
Sec. 1.2. NRS 463.0167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0167 “License fees” means any money required by law to
be paid to obtain or renew a gaming license [,] or manufacturer’s or
distributor’s license . [or license issued to an operator of an off-track
pari-mutuel system. The term also includes the fees paid by a
disseminator of information concerning racing.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 1.3. NRS 463.0171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.0171 “Licensee” means any person to whom a valid
gaming license [,] or a manufacturer’s or distributor’s license [,
license for the operation of an off-track pari-mutuel system or
license for dissemination of information concerning racing] has
been issued.
Sec. 1.4. NRS 463.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.270 1. Subject to the power of the Commission to deny,
revoke, suspend, condition or limit licenses, any state license in
force may be renewed by the Commission for the next succeeding
license period upon proper application for renewal and payment of
state license fees and taxes as required by law and the regulations of
the Commission.
2. All state gaming licenses are subject to renewal on the first
day of each January and all quarterly state gaming licenses on the
first day of each calendar quarter thereafter.
3. Application for renewal must be filed with the Commission,
and all state license fees and taxes required by law, including,
without limitation, NRS 368A.200, 463.370, 463.373 to 463.3855,
inclusive, 463.660 [, 464.015] and 464.040, must be paid to the
Board on or before the dates respectively provided by law for each
fee or tax.
4. Application for renewal of licenses for slot machines only
must be made by the operators of the locations where such machines
are situated.
5. Any person failing to pay any state license fees or taxes due
at the times respectively provided shall pay in addition to such
license fees or taxes a penalty of not less than $50 or 25 percent of
the amount due, whichever is the greater, but not more than $1,000
if the fees or taxes are less than 10 days late and in no case in excess
of $5,000. The penalty must be collected as are other charges,
license fees and penalties under this chapter.
6. Any person who operates, carries on or exposes for play any
gambling game, gaming device or slot machine or who
manufactures, sells or distributes any gaming device, equipment,
material or machine used in gaming after the person’s license
becomes subject to renewal, and thereafter fails to apply for renewal
as provided in this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in
addition to the penalties provided by law, is liable to the State of
Nevada for all license fees, taxes and penalties which would have
been due upon application for renewal.
7. If any licensee or other person fails to renew his or her
license as provided in this section, the Commission may order the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
immediate closure of all his or her gaming activity until the license
is renewed by the payment of the necessary fees, taxes, interest and
any penalties. Except for a license for which fees are based on the
gross revenue of the licensee, failure to renew a license within 30
days after the date required by this chapter shall be deemed a
surrender of the license.
8. The voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee does not
become effective until accepted in the manner provided in the
regulations of the Commission. The surrender of a license does not
relieve the former licensee of any penalties, fines, fees, taxes or
interest due.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 463.386 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.386 1. If the Commission approves the issuance of a
license for gaming operations at the same location that is currently
licensed, or locations that are currently licensed if the license is for
the operation of a slot machine route, the Chair of the Board, in
consultation with the Chair of the Commission may administratively
determine that, for the purposes of NRS 463.370, 463.373 to
463.3855, inclusive, [463.450,] 463.660, 463.677, 463.760 [,] and
463.765 , [and 464.015,] the gaming license shall be deemed
transferred, the previously licensed operation shall be deemed a
continuing operation and credit must be granted for prepaid license
fees, if the Chair of the Board makes a written finding that such
determination is consistent with the public policy of this State
pursuant to NRS 463.0129.
2. The Chair of the Board may refer a request for
administrative determination pursuant to this section to the Board
and the Commission for consideration, or may deny the request for
any reasonable cause. A denial may be submitted for review by the
Board and the Commission in the manner set forth by the
regulations adopted by the Commission which pertain to the review
of administrative approval decisions.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, no credit or
refund of fees or taxes may be made because a gaming
establishment ceases operation.
4. The Commission may, with the advice and assistance of the
Board, adopt regulations consistent with the policy, objects and
purposes of this chapter as it may deem necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 1.6. NRS 463.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.400 Any person who willfully fails to report, pay or
truthfully account for and pay over the license fees imposed by NRS
463.370, 463.373 to 463.3855, inclusive, 463.390 [, 463.450] and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
463.760 to 463.775, inclusive, or willfully attempts in any manner
to evade or defeat any such tax or payment thereof, or any licensee
who puts additional games into play without authority of the
Commission to do so or any licensee who fails to remit any license
fee provided for by this chapter when due is in addition to the
amount due liable for a penalty of the amount of the license fee
evaded or not paid, collected or paid over. The penalty must be
assessed and collected in the same manner as are other charges,
license fees and penalties under this chapter.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 463.426 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.426 1. The Board may [:
1. Authorize] authorize a [disseminator] track or an
authorized agent or representative of a track to enter into an
agreement with [a track to disseminate to] users to provide a live
broadcast [which is received] from the track. Any such agreement
must require that all users pay the same rate or fee for the right to
receive the live broadcast. This section does not apply to a live
broadcast that is furnished to users in connection with an
agreement that allows users to participate in off-track pari-mutuel
wagering at the track pursuant to chapter 464 of NRS.
2. [Establish fees to be paid by a disseminator of a live
broadcast in an amount which is equal to the cost of carrying out the
provisions of NRS 463.421 to 463.427, inclusive.] As used in this
section:
(a) “Live broadcast” means an audio and video transmission
of a race, or series of races, as it occurs at a track and which is
furnished by a track to a user for a fee.
(b) “Track” means a facility licensed to operate horse or other
racing where pari-mutuel wagering on races is conducted.
(c) “User” means an operator of a race book, sports pool or
gambling game who is licensed in this State and receives and
displays a live broadcast within this State and uses information
contained in the broadcast to determine winners of or payoffs on
wagers the operator accepts.
Sec. 1.8. NRS 463.677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
463.677 1. The Legislature finds that:
(a) Technological advances have evolved which allow licensed
gaming establishments to expose games, including, without
limitation, system-based and system-supported games, gaming
devices, interactive gaming, cashless wagering systems or race
books and sports pools, and to be assisted by an interactive gaming
service provider or a service provider, as applicable, who provides
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
important services to the public with regard to the conduct and
exposure of such games.
(b) To protect and promote the health, safety, morals, good
order and general welfare of the inhabitants of this State, and to
carry out the public policy declared in NRS 463.0129, it is necessary
that the Board and Commission have the ability to:
(1) License interactive gaming service providers;
(2) Register service providers; and
(3) Maintain strict regulation and control of the operation of
such interactive gaming service providers or service providers,
respectively, and all persons and locations associated therewith.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Commission may, with the advice and assistance of the Board,
provide by regulation for the:
(a) Licensing of an interactive gaming service provider;
(b) Registration of a service provider; and
(c) Operation of such a service provider or interactive gaming
service provider, respectively, and all persons, locations and matters
associated therewith.
3. The regulations pursuant to subsection 2 may include,
without limitation:
(a) Provisions requiring:
(1) The interactive gaming service provider to meet the
qualifications for licensing pursuant to NRS 463.170, in addition to
any other qualifications established by the Commission and to be
licensed regardless of whether the interactive gaming service
provider holds any license.
(2) The service provider to be registered regardless of
whether the service provider holds any license.
(b) Criteria regarding the location from which the interactive
gaming service provider or service provider, respectively, conducts
its operations, including, without limitation, minimum internal and
operational control standards established by the Commission.
(c) Provisions relating to:
(1) The licensing of persons owning or operating an
interactive gaming service provider, and any person having a
significant involvement therewith, as determined by the
Commission.
(2) The registration of persons owning or operating a service
provider, and any persons having a significant involvement
therewith, as determined by the Commission.
(d) A provision that a person owning, operating or having
significant involvement with an interactive gaming service provider
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
or a service provider, respectively, as determined by the
Commission, may be required by the Commission to be found
suitable to be associated with licensed gaming, including race book
or sports pool operations.
(e) Additional matters which the Commission deems necessary
and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this section and which
are consistent with the public policy of this State pursuant to NRS
463.0129, including that an interactive gaming service provider or a
service provider, respectively, must be liable to the licensee on
whose behalf the services are provided for the interactive gaming
service provider’s or service provider’s proportionate share of the
fees and taxes paid by the licensee.
4. The Commission may not adopt regulations pursuant to this
section until the Commission first determines that interactive
gaming service providers or service providers, respectively, are
secure and reliable, do not pose a threat to the integrity of gaming
and are consistent with the public policy of this State pursuant to
NRS 463.0129.
5. Subject to any regulations adopted by the Commission
pursuant to subsection 6, the premises on which an interactive
gaming service provider or a service provider conducts its
operations are subject to the power and authority of the Board and
Commission pursuant to NRS 463.140, as though the premises are
where gaming is conducted and the interactive gaming service
provider or service provider, respectively, is a gaming licensee.
6. The Commission may adopt regulations that define the
scope of the power and authority of the Board and Commission
provided in subsection 5 as it deems appropriate based on the type
and function of a specific interactive gaming service provider or
service provider.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Interactive gaming service provider” means a person who
acts on behalf of an establishment licensed to operate interactive
gaming and:
(1) Manages, administers or controls wagers that are
initiated, received or made on an interactive gaming system;
(2) Manages, administers or controls the games with which
wagers that are initiated, received or made on an interactive gaming
system are associated;
(3) Maintains or operates the software or hardware of an
interactive gaming system; or
(4) Provides products, services, information or assets to an
establishment licensed to operate interactive gaming and receives
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
therefor a percentage of gaming revenue from the establishment’s
interactive gaming system.
(b) “Service provider” means a person who:
(1) Is a cash access and wagering instrument service
provider; [or]
(2) Is an operator of a system as defined in subsection 7 of
NRS 464.005; or
(3) Meets such other or additional criteria as the Commission
may establish by regulation.
Sec. 2. Chapter 464 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
In addition to any other rights, privileges and immunities
recognized by law, the State of Nevada, the Commission and any
of its members, employees, attorneys and other personnel, the
Board and any of its members, employees, attorneys and other
personnel, and the Off-Track Pari-Mutuel Wagering Committee
appointed pursuant to NRS 464.020 and any of its members,
employees, attorneys and other personnel are immune from civil
liability for any decision or action taken in good faith and without
malicious intent in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 2.1. NRS 464.005 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.005 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Board” means the Nevada Gaming Control Board.
2. “Commission” means the Nevada Gaming Commission.
3. “Gross revenue” means the amount of the commission
received by a [licensee] licensed book that is deducted from off-
track pari-mutuel wagering, plus breakage and the face amount of
unpaid winning tickets that remain unpaid for a period specified by
the [Nevada Gaming] Commission.
4. “Licensed book” means a race book or sports pool licensed
to operate, carry on, conduct or maintain any form of wagering
under a pari-mutuel system of wagering pursuant to this chapter.
[2.] 5. “Off-track pari-mutuel system” means a computerized
system, or component of such a system, that is used with regard to a
pari-mutuel pool to transmit information such as amounts wagered,
odds and payoffs on races, sporting events or other events.
[3.] 6. “Off-track pari-mutuel wagering” means any pari-
mutuel system of wagering approved by the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission for the acceptance of wagers on:
(a) Horse or dog races which take place outside of this state;
(b) Sporting events; or
(c) Other events.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
[4.] 7. “Operator of a system” means a person engaged in
providing an off-track pari-mutuel system. An operator of a system
shall be deemed a service provider as set forth in NRS 463.677 and
is subject to any applicable regulations adopted by the
Commission.
[5.] 8. “Pari-mutuel system of wagering” means any system
whereby wagers with respect to the outcome of a race, sporting
event or other event are placed in a wagering pool conducted by a
person licensed or otherwise permitted to do so under state law, and
in which the participants are wagering with each other and not
against that person. The term includes off-track pari-mutuel
wagering.
Sec. 2.2. NRS 464.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.010 1. It is unlawful for any person, either as owner,
lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, to operate, carry on,
conduct or maintain in this state, any form of wagering under the
pari-mutuel system on any racing, sporting event or other event
without having first procured and maintained all required federal,
state, county and municipal licenses [.] , findings of suitability,
registrations and approvals.
2. It is unlawful for any person to function as an operator of a
system without having first [obtained a state gaming license.]
registered with the Board as a service provider pursuant to
NRS 463.677.
3. Where any other state license , registration or approval is
required to conduct a racing, sporting event or other event, that
license , registration or approval must first be procured before the
pari-mutuel system of wagering may be licensed in connection
therewith.
Sec. 2.3. NRS 464.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.020 1. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission is charged
with the administration of this chapter for the protection of the
public and in the public interest.
2. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission may issue licenses
permitting the conduct of the pari-mutuel system of wagering,
including off-track pari-mutuel wagering, and may adopt, amend
and repeal regulations relating to the conduct of such wagering.
3. The wagering must be conducted only by [the licensee] a
licensed book at the times determined by the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission and only:
(a) Within the enclosure wherein the race, sporting event or
other event which is the subject of the wagering occurs; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(b) Within a licensed gaming establishment which has been
approved to conduct off-track pari-mutuel wagering.
 This subsection [does] and the provisions of NRS 464.060 do not
prohibit a [person] licensed [to accept, pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Nevada Gaming Commission, off-track pari-mutuel
wagers] book from accepting wagers made by wire communication
from patrons within the State of Nevada, from other states in which
such wagering is legal or from places outside the United States in
which such wagering is legal. Neither the off-track pari-mutuel
system nor the operator of a system must be physically present in
this State provided that each is present in another state or location
outside of the United States where off-track pari-mutuel wagering
is legal and is licensed or otherwise approved by a governmental
authority having regulatory jurisdiction or control over pari-
mutuel wagering.
4. The regulations of the [Nevada Gaming] Commission may
include, without limitation:
(a) Requiring fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, or other
method of identification.
(b) Requiring information concerning an applicant’s
antecedents, habits and character.
(c) Prescribing the method and form of application which any
applicant for a license issued pursuant to this chapter must follow
and complete before consideration of the applicant’s application by
the [Nevada Gaming] Commission.
(d) Prescribing the permissible communications technology and
requiring the implementation of border control technology that will
ensure that a person cannot place a wager with a licensee in this
State from another state or another location where placing such a
wager is illegal.
5. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission may appoint an Off-
Track Pari-Mutuel Wagering Committee consisting of 11 persons
who are licensed to engage in off-track pari-mutuel wagering. If the
Commission appoints such a Committee, it shall appoint to the
Committee:
(a) Five members from a list of nominees provided by the State
Association of Gaming Establishments whose members collectively
paid the most gross revenue fees to the State pursuant to NRS
463.370 in the preceding year;
(b) Three members who, in the preceding year, paid gross
revenue fees pursuant to NRS 463.370 in an amount that was less
than the average amount of gross revenue fees paid by licensees
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
engaged in off-track pari-mutuel wagering in the preceding year;
and
(c) Three other members.
 If a vacancy occurs in a position on the Committee for any
reason, including, but not limited to, termination of a member, the
Commission shall appoint a successor member who satisfies the
same criteria in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) that applied to the member
whose position has been vacated.
6. If the [Nevada Gaming] Commission appoints [an Off-Track
Pari-Mutuel Wagering] a Committee pursuant to subsection 5, the
Commission shall:
(a) Grant to the [Off-Track Pari-Mutuel Wagering] Committee
the exclusive right to negotiate an agreement relating to off-track
pari-mutuel wagering with:
(1) A person who is licensed or otherwise permitted to
operate a wagering pool in another state; and
(2) A person who is [licensed] registered pursuant to this
chapter as an operator of a system.
(b) Require that any agreement negotiated by the [Off-Track
Pari-Mutuel Wagering] Committee with a track relating to off-track
pari-mutuel wagering must not set a different rate for intrastate
wagers placed on the licensed premises of a [race] licensed book
and wagers placed through the use of communications technology.
(c) Require the [Off-Track Pari-Mutuel Wagering] Committee to
grant to each person licensed pursuant to this chapter to operate an
off-track pari-mutuel race pool the right to receive, on a fair and
equitable basis, all services concerning wagering in such a race pool
that the Committee has negotiated to bring into or provide within
this State.
7. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission shall, and it is granted
the power to, demand access to and inspect all books and records of
any person licensed pursuant to this chapter pertaining to and
affecting the subject of the license.
Sec. 2.4. NRS 464.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.025 1. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission, upon the
recommendation of the [Nevada Gaming Control] Board, may adopt
regulations for:
(a) The conduct by a [licensee of] licensed book offering off-
track pari-mutuel wagering on a race, sporting event or other event;
and
(b) The approval of the terms and conditions of any agreement
between a [licensee] licensed book and an agency of the state in
which the race, sporting event or other event takes place or a person
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
licensed or approved by that state to participate in the conduct of the
race, sporting event or other event or the pari-mutuel system of
wagering thereon.
2. A person or governmental agency must not receive any
commission or otherwise share in the revenue from the conduct of
off-track pari-mutuel wagering in this State without the approval of
the [Nevada Gaming] Commission. The Commission may approve
any person or governmental agency after such investigation as the
[Nevada Gaming Control] Board deems proper.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 464.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.040 1. The total commission deducted from pari-mutuel
wagering other than off-track pari-mutuel wagering by any licensee
licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter must not exceed
18 percent of the gross amount of money handled in each pari-
mutuel pool operated by the licensee during the period of the
license.
2. The total commission deducted from off-track pari-mutuel
wagering must be determined by the [Nevada Gaming] Commission
and may be divided between the persons licensed , registered or
approved to participate in the conduct of the race or event or the
pari-mutuel system of wagering thereon. Such licensure ,
registration or approval must be obtained pursuant to this chapter or
chapter 463 of NRS and pursuant to regulations which may be
adopted by the [Nevada Gaming] Commission.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 464.045 for off-track
pari-mutuel wagering, each licensee shall pay to the [Nevada
Gaming] Commission quarterly on or before the last day of the first
month of the following quarter of operation for the use of the State
of Nevada a tax at the rate of 3 percent on the total amount of
money wagered on any race, sporting event or other event.
4. The licensee may deduct odd cents less than 10 cents per
dollar in paying bets.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 464.045 for off-track
pari-mutuel wagering, the amount paid to the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission must be, after deducting costs of administration which
must not exceed 5 percent of the amount collected, paid over by the
[Nevada Gaming] Commission to the State Treasurer for deposit in
the State General Fund.
Sec. 2.6. NRS 464.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.060 [All] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
NRS 464.020, all other forms of wagering or betting on the results
of any of the races or events licensed under this chapter outside the
enclosure or establishment where the races, events or off-track
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
pari-mutuel wagering are licensed by the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission are illegal.
Sec. 2.7. NRS 464.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.075 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a
person who is licensed to engage in off-track pari-mutuel wagering
shall not:
(a) Accept from a patron less than the full face value of an off-
track pari-mutuel wager;
(b) Agree to refund or rebate to a patron any portion or
percentage of the full face value of an off-track pari-mutuel wager;
or
(c) Increase the payoff of, or pay a bonus on, a winning off-track
pari-mutuel wager.
2. A person who is licensed to engage in off-track pari-mutuel
wagering and who:
(a) Attempts to evade the provisions of subsection 1 by offering
to a patron a wager that is not posted and offered to all patrons; or
(b) Otherwise violates the provisions of subsection 1,
 is subject to the investigatory and disciplinary proceedings that
are set forth in NRS 463.310 to 463.318, inclusive, and shall be
punished as provided in those sections.
3. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission shall adopt regulations
to carry out the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of this section.
4. The [Nevada Gaming] Commission may, by regulation,
exempt certain bets, refunds, rebates, payoffs or bonuses from the
provisions of subsection 1 if the Commission determines that such
exemptions are in the best interests of the State of Nevada and
licensed gaming in this state. Any bets, refunds, rebates, payoffs or
bonuses that would result in the amount of such bets, refunds,
rebates, payoffs or bonuses being directly or indirectly deductible
from gross revenue may not be exempt.
Sec. 2.8. NRS 464.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
464.080 1. All licenses and registrations granted under this
chapter are subject to suspension or revocation by the [Nevada
Gaming] Commission in any case where the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission has reason to believe that any condition of its license
has not been complied with or that any law or regulation of the
[Nevada Gaming] Commission has been broken or violated.
2. [No] A license or registration may not be revoked or
suspended until after a hearing had by the [Nevada Gaming]
Commission. Such a hearing must be initiated by the filing of a
complaint by the [Nevada Gaming Control] Board and must be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
conducted in accordance with the provisions of NRS 463.312 to
463.3145, inclusive.
3. The action of the [Nevada Gaming] Commission in revoking
or suspending a license or registration issued under this chapter is
subject to court review in accordance with the provisions of NRS
463.315 to 463.318, inclusive.
Sec. 2.9. NRS 463.0147, 463.421, 463.4212, 463.4214,
463.4216, 463.4218, 463.422, 463.423, 463.424, 463.425, 463.427,
463.430, 463.435, 463.440, 463.445, 463.450, 463.460, 463.462,
463.464, 463.466, 463.480 and 464.015 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)